District of Columbia statutes.
38-2701

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a program that enables college-bound residents of the District of Columbia to have greater choices among institutions of higher education.

History

Nov. 12, 1999, 113 Stat. 1323, Pub. L. 106-98, § 2